Hawaii, session 2026, SB3089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The corporation may make downpayment loans, either directly or through a nonprofit organization as defined in section 454F-1, to eligible borrowers who qualify for loans under section 201H-162. The downpayment loan to any one borrower shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the purchase price or appraised value of the residential property or $60,000, whichever is less.  [In no event shall the loan amount and purchase money mortgage amount exceed one hundred per cent of combined loan-to-value.]  The interest rate on the loans may range from one per cent to eight per cent, depending on the buyer's income." SECTION 2. Section 201H-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (c) and (d) to read as follows: "(c) The principal of the downpayment loan, together with accrued interest, shall be due and payable upon the sale, transfer, or refinancing of the property, or shall be repaid by the borrower in installments as determined by the corporation; provided that the corporation may provide a period in which payments may be waived.  The corporation may also forgive all or a portion of the accrued interest, subject to terms and conditions it may establish.  The period over which the principal and interest shall be paid need not coincide with the period over which the loan from the mortgage lender for the balance of the purchase price must be repaid.  The borrower may repay the whole or any part of the unpaid balance of the downpayment loan, plus accrued interest, at any time without penalty. (d) The corporation may secure the services of nonprofit organizations, as defined in section 454F-1, as well as financial institutions, mortgage lenders, or other qualified loan originators, to originate the downpayment loans on behalf of the State for an origination fee not in excess of the prevailing loan origination fee amount, as determined by the corporation." SECTION 3. Section 201H-162, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) No person shall be qualified for a downpayment loan unless the person: (1)  Is a citizen of the United States or a resident alien; (2)  Is at least eighteen years of age; (3)  Is a bona fide resident of the State; (4)  Will physically reside in the residential property to be purchased for the term of the loan; (5)  Is accepted by a mortgage lender as a person to whom it is willing to lend money for the purchase of the residential property provided the required downpayment is made; (6)  Provides a portion of the downpayment which shall be equal to [at least five] three per cent of the sales price[; and], which may include any downpayment loan assistance made available by the corporation under this chapter; and (7)  Has successfully completed a homeownership counseling program provided by a housing counseling agency approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development." SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST